Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.480

Cooperative contracts or agreements to further chapter—Agreements to facilitate export.

The director may cooperate with and enter into contracts or agreements with governmental agencies of this state and other states, agencies of the federal government, and any other organization in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

The director may enter into agreements with the United States department of agriculture for the purpose of issuing phytosanitary certificates and other inspection documents, according to federal procedures, to facilitate the export of products from the state.

[ 2000 c 144 s 30; 1993 c 120 s 18; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 26.]